Missouri, session 2026, HB2068.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 288.050, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 288.050 and 288.104, to read as follows:
288.050. 1. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this law, a claimant shall be
disqualified for waiting week credit or benefits until after the claimant has earned wages for
work insured pursuant to the unemployment compensation laws of any state equal to ten
times the claimant's weekly benefit amount if the deputy finds:
(1) That the claimant has left work voluntarily without good cause attributable to such
work or to the claimant's employer. A temporary employee of a temporary help firm will be
deemed to have voluntarily quit employment if the employee does not contact the temporary
help firm for reassignment prior to filing for benefits. Failure to contact the temporary help
firm will not be deemed a voluntary quit unless the claimant has been advised of the
obligation to contact the firm upon completion of assignments and that unemployment
benefits may be denied for failure to do so. "Good cause", for the purposes of this
subdivision, shall include only that cause which would compel a reasonable employee to
cease working or which would require separation from work due to illness or disability. The
claimant shall not be disqualified:
(a) If the deputy finds the claimant quit such work for the purpose of accepting a
more remunerative job which the claimant did accept and earn some wages therein;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2068 2
(b) If the claimant quit temporary work to return to such claimant's regular employer;
or
(c) If the deputy finds the individual quit work, which would have been determined
not suitable in accordance with paragraphs [(a)] (c) and [(b)] (d) of subdivision (3) of this
subsection, within twenty-eight calendar days of the first day worked;
(d) As to initial claims filed after December 31, 1988, if the claimant presents
evidence supported by competent medical proof that she was forced to leave her work
because of pregnancy, notified her employer of such necessity as soon as practical under the
circumstances, and returned to that employer and offered her services to that employer as
soon as she was physically able to return to work, as certified by a licensed and practicing
physician, but in no event later than ninety days after the termination of the pregnancy. An
employee shall have been employed for at least one year with the same employer before she
may be provided benefits pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph;
(e) If the deputy finds that, due to the spouse's mandatory and permanent military
change of station order, the claimant quit work to relocate with the spouse to a new residence
from which it is impractical to commute to the place of employment and the claimant
remained employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move. The claimant's spouse shall
be a member of the U.S. Armed Forces who is on active duty, or a member of the National
Guard or other reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces who is on active National Guard
or reserve duty. The provisions of this paragraph shall only apply to individuals who have
been determined to be an insured worker as provided in subdivision (22) of subsection 1 of
section 288.030;
(2) That the claimant has retired pursuant to the terms of a labor agreement between
the claimant's employer and a union duly elected by the employees as their official
representative or in accordance with an established policy of the claimant's employer; or
(3) (a) That the claimant failed without good cause [either] to:
a. Apply for available suitable work when so directed by a deputy of the division or
designated staff of an employment office as defined in subsection 1 of section 288.030[, or
to];
b. Accept suitable work when offered [the claimant, either through the division or
directly by an employer by whom the individual was formerly employed, or to];
c. Appear for a scheduled job interview for suitable work or a skills test three
times within an unemployment cycle when such interview or skills test is offered to the
claimant, either through the division or directly by an employer; or
d. Return to the individual's customary self-employment, if any, when so directed by
the deputy[.];

HB 2068 3
(b) For the purposes of this subdivision, an offer of suitable work, suitable job
interview, or skills test shall be rebuttably presumed if an employer notifies the claimant in
writing of such offer [by sending an acknowledgment via any form of certified mail issued by
the United States Postal Service stating such offer to the claimant at the claimant's last known
address] or by a method or manner prescribed by the division. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to limit the means by which the deputy may establish that the claimant has
or has not been sufficiently notified of available work. In enforcing this subdivision, the
division shall establish a method allowing verified employers to report any individual
who fails to accept or respond to an offer of employment or appear for a previously
scheduled job interview or skills test;
[(a)] (c) In determining whether or not any work is suitable for an individual, the
division shall consider, among other factors and in addition to those enumerated in paragraph
(b) of this subdivision, the degree of risk involved to the individual's health, safety and
morals, the individual's physical fitness and prior training, the individual's experience and
prior earnings, the individual's length of unemployment, the individual's prospects for
securing work in the individual's customary occupation, the distance of available work from
the individual's residence and the individual's prospect of obtaining local work; except that, if
an individual has moved from the locality in which the individual actually resided when such
individual was last employed to a place where there is less probability of the individual's
employment at such individual's usual type of work and which is more distant from or
otherwise less accessible to the community in which the individual was last employed, work
offered by the individual's most recent employer if similar to that which such individual
performed in such individual's last employment and at wages, hours, and working conditions
which are substantially similar to those prevailing for similar work in such community, or any
work which the individual is capable of performing at the wages prevailing for such work in
the locality to which the individual has moved, if not hazardous to such individual's health,
safety or morals, shall be deemed suitable for the individual[.];
[(b)] (d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this law, no work shall be deemed
suitable and benefits shall not be denied pursuant to this law to any otherwise eligible
individual for refusing to accept new work under any of the following conditions:
a. If the position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor
dispute;
b. If the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less
favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality;
c. If as a condition of being employed the individual would be required to join a
company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

HB 2068 4
2. If a deputy finds that a claimant has been discharged for misconduct connected
with the claimant's work, such claimant shall be disqualified for waiting week credit and
benefits, and no benefits shall be paid nor shall the cost of any benefits be charged against any
employer for any period of employment within the base period until the claimant has earned
wages for work insured under the unemployment laws of this state or any other state as
prescribed in this section. In addition to the disqualification for benefits pursuant to this
provision the division may in the more aggravated cases of misconduct cancel all or any part
of the individual's wage credits, which were established through the individual's employment
by the employer who discharged such individual, according to the seriousness of the
misconduct. A disqualification provided for pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to any
week which occurs after the claimant has earned wages for work insured pursuant to the
100 unemployment compensation laws of any state in an amount equal to six times the claimant's
101 weekly benefit amount. Should a claimant be disqualified on a second or subsequent
102 occasion within the base period or subsequent to the base period the claimant shall be
103 required to earn wages in an amount equal to or in excess of six times the claimant's weekly
104 benefit amount for each disqualification.
105 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, a claimant may not
106 be determined to be disqualified for benefits because the claimant is in training approved
107 pursuant to Section 236 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended, (19 U.S.C.A. Sec. 2296, as
108 amended), or because the claimant left work which was not suitable employment to enter
109 such training. For the purposes of this subsection "suitable employment" means, with respect
110 to a worker, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the worker's past adversely
111 affected employment, and wages for such work at not less than eighty percent of the worker's
112 average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of the Trade Act of 1974.
288.104. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Employment
Security Program Integrity Act of 2026".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department of corrections", the Missouri department of corrections;
(2) "Division", the division of employment security of the Missouri department
of labor and industrial relations;
(3) "Employment security rolls", the list of all persons currently receiving
unemployment compensation benefits under this chapter, to be kept and updated by the
division;
(4) "National data check system", any public, private, or nonprofit national data
system designed to verify the identity, employment status, eligibility status, and claims
submitted status of any individual participating in, or applying to participate in, an
unemployment compensation program;

HB 2068 5
(5) "New-hire records", the directory of newly hired and rehired employees
reported under applicable state and federal laws;
(6) "Welfare agency", any state agency, department, or entity that distributes or
administers public assistance benefits, other than unemployment compensation benefits,
through the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP), Medicaid, or public housing programs.
3. The division shall engage with and utilize a national data check system to
ensure that only eligible individuals receive unemployment compensation benefits
pursuant to this chapter.
4. The division shall, on a weekly basis, check its employment security rolls
against a list of incarcerated individuals, which shall be provided to the division by the
department of corrections, to verify the eligibility of unemployment compensation
benefit claimants and to ensure that only eligible individuals receive unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to this chapter.
5. The division shall, on a weekly basis, check its employment security rolls
against state death records.
6. The division shall, on a weekly basis, check its new-hire records against the
records contained in the National Directory of New Hires in order to verify the
eligibility of the individuals named in the division's new-hire records.
7. The division shall verify the identity of unemployment compensation benefit
claimants by methods including, but not limited to:
(1) Verifying the identity of an applicant prior to awarding benefits; and
(2) Requiring multi-factor authentication as part of online applications.
8. The division shall perform a full eligibility review of suspicious or potentially
improper claims in cases including, but not limited to:
(1) Multiple or duplicative claims filed online originating from the same internet
protocol address;
(2) Claims filed online from foreign internet protocol addresses;
(3) Multiple or duplicative claims filed that are associated with the same mailing
address; and
(4) Multiple or duplicative claims filed that are associated with the same bank
account.
9. Any welfare agency, upon receipt of information that an enrolled individual
has become employed, shall notify the division in order that the division may determine
whether the individual remains eligible for unemployment compensation benefits.
10. (1) The division shall adopt and implement internal administrative policies
to prioritize and pursue the recovery of fraudulent or otherwise improper

HB 2068 6
unemployment compensation benefit overpayments to the fullest extent allowable under
applicable state and federal law. The division shall attempt to recover all outstanding
unemployment compensation benefit overpayments unless doing so would violate state
or federal law.
(2) The division shall maintain records of all of its attempts to recover
unemployment compensation benefit overpayments. The division shall issue a written
report to the general assembly each year, no later than December thirty-first, describing
improper unemployment compensation benefit payments and their recovery, the extent
to which any improper unemployment compensation benefit payments have not been
corrected or recovered, and the reasons for the failure of the division to secure such
correction or recovery.
11. The division is hereby authorized to execute a memorandum of
understanding with any governmental entity of this state in order to share and
receive such information as may be necessary for the division to administer the
provisions of this section.
12. If the division receives information relating to an individual who has been
found eligible for unemployment compensation benefits and such information indicates
a change in circumstances that could affect the individual's eligibility, the division shall
review the individual's eligibility case.
13. The division may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔